Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2378.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title and section 1 of the act of July 15, 2004 (P.L.731, No.85), known as the Elderly Immunization Act, are amended to read:AN ACTProviding for immunization against the influenza virus and pneumococcal disease for elderly and high risk persons.Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Elderly and High Risk Immunization Act.Section 2. The definition of "eligible person" in section 2 of the act is amended to read:<--12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Eligible person." A person:(1) [65] 50 years of age or older[.] for pneumococcal vaccination.(2) 50 years of age or older for influenza vaccination.(3) 75 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER FOR RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS.* * *SECTION 3. SECTIONS 3 AND 4 OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 3. VACCINATION OFFERED TO ELIGIBLE PERSONS.(A) GENERAL RULE.--WHEN AN ELIGIBLE PERSON IS ADMITTED TO A HOSPITAL FOR A PERIOD OF MORE THAN 24 HOURS FOR A CONDITION UNRELATED TO THE INFLUENZA VIRUS, RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS OR PNEUMOCOCCAL DISEASE, HE OR SHE SHALL BE INFORMED THAT A VACCINATION FOR THE INFLUENZA VIRUS, RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS AND PNEUMOCOCCAL DISEASE IS AVAILABLE AND PROVIDED THE OPPORTUNITY TO RECEIVE VACCINATION AGAINST THE INFLUENZA VIRUS, RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS AND PNEUMOCOCCAL DISEASE PRIOR TO DISCHARGE FROM THE HOSPITAL. IMMUNIZATION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION PRACTICES OF THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION.(B) OTHER FACILITIES TO OFFER VACCINATION.--VACCINATION FOR THE INFLUENZA VIRUS, RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS AND PNEUMOCOCCAL DISEASE SHALL ALSO BE OFFERED TO AN ELIGIBLE PERSON AT FACILITIES PROVIDING ONGOING MEDICAL CARE TO THE EXTENT 20260HB2378PN3632 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 POSSIBLE AS DETERMINED BY THE FACILITY. IF THE FACILITY DETERMINES IT IS NOT POSSIBLE TO PROVIDE THE VACCINE, INFORMATION SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE PATIENT ON OTHER OPTIONS FOR OBTAINING THE VACCINE.(C) TIME FRAME FOR AVAILABILITY OF INFLUENZA, RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS AND PNEUMOCOCCAL VACCINE.--(1) THE INFLUENZA VACCINE SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE FOR ELIGIBLE PERSONS DURING THE MONTHS OF OCTOBER AND NOVEMBER. VACCINATION EFFORTS MAY CONTINUE INTO DECEMBER AND LATER BASED ON AVAILABILITY OF THE VACCINE.(2) THE PNEUMOCOCCAL [VACCINE] AND RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS VACCINES SHALL BE AVAILABLE FOR ELIGIBLE PERSONS.(D) PROTOCOLS.--VACCINES MAY BE ADMINISTERED UNDER INSTITUTION-APPROVED OR PHYSICIAN-APPROVED PROTOCOLS AFTER AN ASSESSMENT HAS BEEN MADE FOR CONTRAINDICATIONS.(E) RESPONSIBILITY OF PERSON ADMINISTERING VACCINE.--IT SHALL BE THE RESPONSIBILITY OF THE PERSON ADMINISTERING THE VACCINE TO INQUIRE AS TO WHETHER THE ELIGIBLE PERSON HAS ALREADY RECEIVED A VACCINATION AGAINST THE INFLUENZA VIRUS, RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS OR PNEUMOCOCCAL DISEASE.(F) DOCUMENTATION OF VACCINE.--RECEIPT OF THE VACCINATION SHALL BE DOCUMENTED ON THE PATIENT'S CHART AND MADE A PART OF THE PATIENT'S PERMANENT RECORD AT THE HOSPITAL OR OTHER FACILITY.SECTION 4. RESPONSIBILITIES OF DEPARTMENT.(A) PROMULGATION OF REGULATIONS.--THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROMULGATE REGULATIONS RELATING TO THIS ACT, TAKING INTO CONSIDERATION THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE ON IMMUNIZATION PRACTICES OF THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION.20260HB2378PN3632 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE EDUCATIONAL AND INFORMATIONAL MATERIALS TO ALL HOSPITALS AND OTHER FACILITIES PROVIDING ONGOING MEDICAL CARE CONCERNING VACCINATION AGAINST THE INFLUENZA VIRUS, RESPIRATORY SYNCYTIAL VIRUS AND PNEUMOCOCCAL DISEASE.Section 3 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2378PN3632 - 4 - <--123456